fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-mitîh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mitîh : :

      # Core

      # Poss
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitîh
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitîh
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: otîh
      

      # Der/Dim
      mitîh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Sg: mitîh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Sg
      

      # Poss # Sg
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitîh
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitîh
      
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nitîhinân
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Sg: kitîhinaw
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kitîhiwâw
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: otîhithiw
      
      mitîh+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: mitîh
      

      # Poss # Pl
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nitîha
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kitîha
      
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nitîhinâna
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Pl: kitîhinawa
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kitîhiwâwa
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: otîhithiwa
      
      mitîh+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: mitîha
      

      # Poss # Loc
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nitîhihk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kitîhihk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: otîhihk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nitîhinâhk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Loc: kitîhinâhk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kitîhiwâhk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: otîhiwâhk
      mitîh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otîhithihk
      mitîh+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: mitîhihk
      
